nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Rengjøring og pleie av smykker: Rengjørings- og poleringsmidler for smykker; Rengjøringsverkøy for smykker; Smykkeholdere; Smykkereparasjon og størrelsesjusteringstjenester; Smykkestørrelsesverktøy; Damprensere for smykker; Reparasjonssett for klokker
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Reiniging en onderhoud van sieraden: Reinigings- en polijstvloeistoffen voor sieraden; Reinigers voor sieraden; Sieradenhouders; Sieraden reparatie en maatverandering services; Sieraden maatgereedschap; Stoomreinigers voor sieraden; Reparatiekits voor horloge
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Juvelyrinių dirbinių valymas ir priežiūra: Juvelyrinių dirbinių valikliai ir poliruokliai; Juvelyrinių dirbinių valymo įrankiai; Juvelyrinių dirbinių laikikliai; Papuošalų taisymo ir dydžio keitimo paslaugos; Papuošalų dydžio nustatymo įrankiai; Gariniai juvelyrinių dirbinių valymo įrenginiai; Laikrodžių remonto rinkiniai
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลและทำความสะอาดเครื่องเพชรพลอย: น้ำยาขัดและทำความสะอาดเครื่องประดับ; เครื่องมือทำความสะอาดเครื่องเพชรพลอย; ที่ใส่เครื่องประดับ; บริการซ่อมและปรับขนาดเครื่องประดับ; เครื่องมือวัดขนาดเครื่องประดับ; เครื่องทำความสะอาดเครื่องเพชรพลอยระบบไอน้ำ; ชุดซ่อมแซมนาฬิกา
es: Salud y belleza > Limpieza y cuidado de joyas: Soluciones y pulidos para joyas; Artículos para la limpieza de joyas; Soportes para joyería; Servicios de reparación y cambio de talla de joyería; Herramientas de medición de joyería; Vaporizadores para joyas; Kits de reparación de relojes
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Čišćenje i njega nakita: Otopine za čišćenje i poliranje nakita; Alati za čišćenje i njegu nakita; Držači za nakit; Usluge popravka i prilagođavanja veličine nakita; Alati za mjerenje veličine nakita; Parni čistači nakita; Kompleti za popravak satova
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Mücevher Temizlik ve Bakımı: Mücevher Temizleme Ürünleri ve Parlatıcılar; Mücevher Temizleme Araçları; Mücevher Düzenleyiciler; Mücevher Onarım ve Ölçü Değiştirme Hizmetleri; Mücevher Ölçü Araçları; Buharlı Mücevher Temizleyiciler; Kol Saati Tamir Setleri
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Smyckesvård och smyckesrengöring: Smyckesrengöringsmedel; Verktyg för smyckesrengöring; Smyckesställ; Smyckesreparations- och storleksändringstjänster; Smyckesmåttverktyg; Ångrengöring för smycken; Reparationskit för armbandsur
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Vệ sinh và bảo quản trang sức: Đánh bóng và giải pháp làm sạch trang sức; Dụng cụ làm sạch trang sức; Giá treo và hộp đựng trang sức; Dịch vụ sửa chữa & đổi cỡ trang sức; Dụng cụ đo cỡ trang sức; Bình xịt làm sạch trang sức; Bộ dụng cụ sửa chữa đồng hồ
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Curățarea și îngrijirea bijuteriilor: Soluții de curățare și lustruire pentru bijuterii; Instrumente pentru curățarea bijuteriilor; Suporturi pentru bijuterii; Servicii de reparație și redimensionare bijuterii; Instrumente pentru dimensionarea bijuteriilor; Dispozitive de curățat bijuterii cu abur; Seturi de reparații ceasuri
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Čiščenje in nega nakita: Raztopine in loščila za čiščenje nakita; Orodja za čiščenje nakita; Držala za nakit; Popravilo in prilagajanje velikosti nakita; Orodja za prilagajanje velikosti nakita; Parni čistilniki nakita; Kompleti za popravilo ur
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Почистване и грижа за бижута: Разтвори и лакове за почистване на бижута; Инструменти за почистване на бижута; Поставки за бижута; Услуги за ремонт и преоразмеряване на бижута; Инструменти за измерване на бижута; Парочистачки за бижута; Комплекти за ремонт на часовници
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Limpeza e cuidado de joalharia: Polimentos e soluções de limpeza de joalharia; Ferramentas de limpeza de joalharia; Suportes de joalharia; Serviços de reparação e ajuste de joias; Ferramentas de medição de joias; Limpadores a vapor de joalharia; Kits de reparação de relógios
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 首飾清潔保養: 珠寶清潔保養工具; 珠寶清洗用具; 飾品架; 珠寶修復及調整服務; 珠寶測量工具; 珠寶用蒸汽清洗機; 修錶工具組
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Smykkerens og pleje: Rense- og pudsevæsker til smykker; Værktøj til rensning af smykker; Smykkeholdere; Smykkereparation og tilpasningsservice; Værktøjer til tilpasning af smykker; Smykkedamprensere; Reparationssæt til ure
it: Salute e bellezza > Pulizia e cura dei gioielli: Detergenti e soluzioni per la pulizia di gioielli; Strumenti per la pulizia di gioielli; Portagioie; Servizi di riparazione e ridimensionamento di gioielli; Strumenti di misurazione dei gioielli; Detergenti a vapore per gioielli; Kit riparazione orologi
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Schmuckreinigung & -pflege: Lösungen und Poliermittel zur Schmuckreinigung; Hilfsmittel zur Schmuckreinigung; Schmuckständer & -kästen; Schmuckreparatur- & Größenanpassungsdienste; Schmuckgrößenmesswerkzeuge; Dampfstrahlreiniger für Schmuck; Uhrreparatursätze
hu: Egészség és szépség > Ékszertisztítás és -ápolás: Ékszertisztító oldatok és fényezők; Ékszertisztító eszközök; Ékszertartók; Ékszerjavító és méretező szolgáltatások; Ékszerméretező eszközök; Ékszergőztisztítók; Órajavító készletek
ko: 건강/미용 > 주얼리 세척/관리: 주얼리 세척제/광택제; 주얼리 세척 도구; 주얼리 보관 용품; 주얼리 수리 및 크기 조정 서비스; 주얼리 사이즈 측정 도구; 주얼리 증기 세척기; 시계 수리 키트
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 珠宝首饰清洗与护理: 珠宝清洁剂与上光剂; 珠宝首饰清洁工具; 首饰收纳/展具; 首饰维修与调整服务; 首饰尺寸工具; 珠宝首饰蒸汽清洁器; 手表修理套装
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Καθαρισμός & περιποίηση κοσμημάτων: Λύσεις & γυαλιστικά καθαρισμού κοσμημάτων; Εργαλεία καθαρισμού κοσμημάτων; Κάτοχοι κοσμημάτων; Υπηρεσίες επισκευής κοσμημάτων; Εργαλεία μέτρησης κοσμημάτων; Ατμοκαθαριστές κοσμημάτων; Κιτ επισκευής ρολογιών
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Limpeza e cuidado de jóias: Produtos para limpeza e polimento de joias; Ferramentas para limpeza de joias; Porta-jóias; Serviços de reparo e ajuste de joias; Ferramentas para medição de joias; Limpadores a vapor para joias; Kits para conserto de relógios
ru: Красота и здоровье > Уход за ювелирными изделиями: Очищающие растворы и полироли для ювелирных изделий; Инструменты для чистки ювелирных изделий; Хранение ювелирных изделий; Услуги ремонта и изменения размера украшений; Инструменты для определения размера украшений; Пароочистители для ювелирных изделий; Наборы для ремонта часов
fr: Santé et beauté > Entretien et nettoyage des bijoux: Cirages et solutions de nettoyage pour bijoux; Outils de nettoyage pour bijoux; Présentoirs à bijoux; Outils de mesure et de mise à taille pour bijoux; Outils de mesure pour bijoux; Nettoyeurs à vapeur pour bijoux; Kits de réparation pour montres
ja: 美容・健康 > ジュエリーお手入れ用品: ジュエリー洗浄液/ポリッシュ; ジュエリー洗浄用品; ジュエリーボックス・ジュエリースタンド; ジュエリー修理・サイズ直しサービス; ジュエリーサイズ測定器具; ジュエリー スチーム クリーナー; 時計修理キット
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Čistenie a starostlivosť o šperky: Čistiace prostriedky a leštidlá na šperky; Nástroje na čistenie šperkov; Držiaky na šperky; Služby opráv a úprav veľkosti šperkov; Nástroje na meranie veľkosti šperkov; Parné čističe šperkov; Sady na opravu hodiniek
cs: Zdraví a krása > Čištění a péče o šperky: Roztoky a leštidla na čištění šperků; Nástroje na čištění šperků; Skříňky a stojany na šperky; Služby opravy a úpravy velikosti šperků; Nástroje na měření velikosti šperků; Parní čističky na šperky; Hodinářské sady
en: Health & Beauty > Jewelry Cleaning & Care: Jewelry Cleaning Solutions & Polishes; Jewelry Cleaning Tools; Jewelry Holders; Jewelry Repair & Resizing Services; Jewelry Sizing Tools; Jewelry Steam Cleaners; Watch Repair Kits
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Czyszczenie i pielęgnacja biżuterii: Środki czyszczące i polerujące do biżuterii; Narzędzia do czyszczenia biżuterii; Przechowywanie biżuterii; Usługi naprawy i zmiany rozmiaru biżuterii; Narzędzia do mierzenia rozmiaru biżuterii; Urządzenia parowe do czyszczenia biżuterii; Zestawy do naprawy zegarków
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Korujen puhdistus ja huolto: Korujen puhdistus- ja kiillotusaineet; Korujen puhdistusvälineet; Korutelineet; Korun korjaus- ja koonmuutospalvelu; Korumittausväline; Korujen höyrypuhdistuslaitteet; Kellon korjaussetit